Illinois, session 104th, HB4796.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 201 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/201)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1201)7    Sec. 201. (a) The Department shall carry out the 8provisions of this Article. The Department or its successor 9agency may, by administrative rule, add additional substances 10to or delete or reschedule all controlled substances in the 11Schedules of Sections 204, 206, 208, 210 and 212 of this Act. 12In making a determination regarding the addition, deletion, or 13rescheduling of a substance, the Department shall consider the 14following:15        (1) the actual or relative potential for misuse;16        (2) the scientific evidence of its pharmacological 17    effect, if known;18        (3) the state of current scientific knowledge 19    regarding the substance;20        (4) the history and current pattern of misuse;21        (5) the scope, duration, and significance of misuse;22        (6) the risk to the public health;23        (7) the potential of the substance to produce   HB4796- 2 -LRB104 16241 RLC 29625 b1    psychological or physiological dependence or a substance 2    use disorder;3        (8) whether the substance is an immediate precursor of 4    a substance already controlled under this Article;5        (9) the immediate harmful effect in terms of 6    potentially fatal dosage; and7        (10) the long-range effects in terms of permanent 8    health impairment.9    (b) (Blank). 10    (c) (Blank). 11    (d) If any substance is scheduled, rescheduled, or deleted 12as a controlled substance under Federal law and notice thereof 13is given to the Department, the Department shall similarly 14control the substance under this Act after the expiration of 1530 days from publication in the Federal Register of a final 16order scheduling a substance as a controlled substance or 17rescheduling or deleting a substance, unless within that 30 18day period the Department objects, or a party adversely 19affected files with the Department substantial written 20objections objecting to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion. 21In that case, the Department shall publish the reasons for 22objection or the substantial written objections and afford all 23interested parties an opportunity to be heard. At the 24conclusion of the hearing, the Department shall publish its 25decision, by means of a rule, which shall be final unless 26altered by statute. Upon publication of objections by the   HB4796- 3 -LRB104 16241 RLC 29625 b1Department, similar control under this Act whether by 2inclusion, rescheduling or deletion is stayed until the 3Department publishes its ruling.4    (d-1) If any substance, scheduled as a Schedule I 5controlled substance by the Administration, is rescheduled for 6the purpose of treating mental health disorders, including, 7but not limited to, anxiety, depression, and post traumatic 8stress disorder, the Department shall reschedule the substance 9accordingly within 30 days from the publication in the Federal 10Register of the final order rescheduling the substance. 11    (e) (Blank).12    (f) (Blank).13    (g) Authority to control under this Section does not 14extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco 15as those terms are defined or used in the Liquor Control Act of 161934 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995.17    (h) Persons registered with the Drug Enforcement 18Administration to manufacture or distribute controlled 19substances shall maintain adequate security and provide 20effective controls and procedures to guard against theft and 21diversion, but shall not otherwise be required to meet the 22physical security control requirements (such as cage or vault) 23for Schedule V controlled substances containing 24pseudoephedrine or Schedule II controlled substances 25containing dextromethorphan. 26(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.)